src/scripts/Tatar/numbers.foma
# Copyright (C) 2017  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;
define Number [%0|[NZDigit Digit^<12]];

define NamesOfPowersOfTen мең|миллион|миллиард ; 

define InsertThousands 
[..] -> мең || Digit _ Digit^3 .#.;

define InsertMillions 
[..] -> миллион || Digit _ Digit^3 мең;

define InsertBillions 
[..] -> миллиард || Digit _ Digit^3 миллион;

define InsertHundreds 
[NZDigit 0:йөз] | [%0:0] -> || _ Digit^2 ; 

define RemoveSkippedParts 
%0^3 NamesOfPowersOfTen @-> 0 ; 

define Units %0:0|1:бер|2:ике|3:өч|4:дүрт|5:биш|6:алты|7:җиде|8:сигез|9:тугыз;

define Teens 1:0 [%0:ун|1:унбер|2:унике|3:унөч|4:ундүрт|5:унбиш|6:уналты|7:унҗиде|8:унсигез|9:унтугыз] ; 

define Tens %0:0|2:егерме|3:утыз|4:кырык|5:илле|6:алтмыш|7:җитмеш|8:сиксән|9:туксан ; 

define UpToHundred %0:нүл .P. [Teens | [(Tens) Units]];

define DigitsToWords 
UpToHundred @-> ; 

regex 
Number .o. 
InsertThousands .o. 
InsertMillions .o. 
InsertBillions .o. 
RemoveSkippedParts .o. 
InsertHundreds .o. 
DigitsToWords ; 
